src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON DAHPPA !!≈ * **@CODE@** dahpa, dáhpa and dáhppa. to avoid dáhpahuvvat, dahpahuvvat etc in speller
! :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
! +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4k K ;
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>X8 K ; ! Ditto (?)
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»W4heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X1n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X1n%> NPxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X7n%> NPxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:»W4hin K ;		!
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»W4his%> ATTR ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»W4h EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV+Use/-PLX:»W4huvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
! +Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-PLX:»W4huhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON LAHKI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** the words on -láhki. Because in speller we want to aviod boasttoláhkái, borranláhki etc. (borran láhkai)
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;

 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> NPxC-LAHKI ;

 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
< "+Pl":j "+Nom":d 0:%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC-LAHKI ; !lágiidan
 +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC-LAHKI ; !lágiidan
 +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxPlComC ;

 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :%>X8 GOADE-IU- ; ! Ditto (?)
 :%> DenominalAdjsV1 ;
! :%> DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 :%> DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON NPxC-LAHKI !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 @R.Px.add@ PxC-LAHKI ;

LEXICON PxC-LAHKI
 +PxSg1+Err/Orth:am9 K ; ! !SOUTH
 +PxDu1:eame K ;
 +PxPl1:eamet K ;
Px2C ;
! +PxSg3:is K ;   láhkásis Bug2506
 +PxDu3:easkka K ;
 +PxDu3+Err/Orth:easka K ;
 +PxPl3:easet K ;


LEXICON BEARRI !!≈ * **@CODE@**  to avoid unfortunate diminutives like bearáš and salaš in speller (bearaš, sálaš) +  "beassán" = beassi+Sg+Nom/Gen/Acc+PxSg1
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
! +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx1V ;  beassán
! +Sg+Gen:%>X2 NPx1V ;  beassán
! +Sg+Acc:%>X2 NPx1V ;  beassán
! +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx2V ;  beassát
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> NPxC ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 +Err/DerSub:%>X4X7 KEAHTTA ;
 +Err/DerSub:%>X4 KEAHTTA ;
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :%>X8 GOADE-IU- ; ! Ditto (?)
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
!   DenominalNounsV ;



LEXICON ACTORGEAHCCI !!≈ * **@CODE@** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG
 +NomAg+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG: ACTORGEAHCCICT ;

LEXICON ACTORGEAHCCICT !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Actors, to avoid geahččán, jábmán, geahččát, jábmát
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
! +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx1V ;   geahččán, jábmán
! +Sg+Gen:%>X2 NPx1V ;  geahččán, jábmán
! +Sg+Acc:%>X2 NPx1V ;  geahččán, jábmán
! +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx2V ; geahččát
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> NPxC ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon dipth simpl
! +Use/NG:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon no dipth simpl
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 +Use/NG:X5%> GODII- ; ! optional dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; !  dipth simpl
! :%>X2 GOADA- ; ! AG Px    geahččát

LEXICON ACTORVALDI !!≈ * **@CODE@** lexicalized actors because we have restricted verb derivation for speller. Long compound-forms, without "váldán"
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
! +Sg+Nom: NPx1V ;    without "váldán"
! +Sg+Gen: NPx1V ;    without "váldán"
! +Sg+Acc: NPx1V ;    without "váldán"
 +Sg+Nom: NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Ill:s%> NPxC ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Use/NG:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
! :%>X5 GODII- ; ! optional dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; !  obligatory dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px


!! 2f. Actor lexicas
!   ----------------


LEXICON ACTOR !!≈ * **@CODE@** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG
 +NomAg+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG: ACTORCT ;

LEXICON ACTORCT !!≈ * **@CODE@** nowadays tagged NomAg. Long compound-forms
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon  dipth simpl
 !+Use/NG:%>W9 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon  optional dipth simpl
! +Use/NG:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon    no dipth simpl
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 +Use/NG:%>X5 GODII- ; ! optional dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; !  obl dipth simpl
 :%>X2 GOADA- ; ! AG Px


LEXICON ACTOR-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** Plurals
 +NomAg: ACTOR-PLCT ;

LEXICON ACTOR-PLCT
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:%>X5jd9 K ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Cmp/PlGen+Use/NG:%>X5jd R ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd9 K ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Ill+Use/NG:%>X5jde K ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Loc+Use/NG:%>X5jn K ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Com+Use/NG:%>X5jgujn K ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Use/NG:%>X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin  !optional dipht simpl
 +Sg+Com+Use/NG:jn%>X5 NPxC ; !optional dipht simpl
 : ACTOR-PLCT-FLAG ;
< "+Pl":j "+Nom":d 0:%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1C ;  !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:jd%>X5 NPxC ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Acc+Use/NG:jd%>X5 NPxC ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Ill+Use/NG:jdasa%>X5 NPxVvowch ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Com+Use/NG:jd%>X5 NPxPlComC ; !optional dipht simpl
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:jn%>X5 NPxPlComC ; !optional dipht simpl

LEXICON ACTOR-PLCT-FLAG
< "+Pl":j "+Nom":d 0:%> 0:X5 "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1C ;  !optional dipht simpl
