src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
adni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:adni¤ ACTOR "user N" ;
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
bagadalli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:bagadalli¤ ACTOR ;
bargi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:bargi¤ ACTORGEAHCCI ;
bargit+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:bargi ACTOR-PL ;
bearri+N+Sem/State-sick:bearri BEARRI ;
beassanláhki+N+Sem/Feat:beassan#láhºki LAHKI ;
beassi+N+Sem/Build:beassi BEARRI ;
biirrečálli+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Hum_Pos:biire#čálli¤ ACTOR ;
birgenláhki+N+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Feat:birgen#lahºki LAHKI ;
birgenláhki+N+Sem/Feat:birgen#láhºki LAHKI ;
boazodoalloláhki+N+Sem/Feat:boazo#doallo#láhºki LAHKI ;
borranláhki+N+Sem/Feat:borran#láhºki LAHKI ;
buolddagužži+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:buoldda#gužži¤ ACTOR ;
buvttadanláhki+N+Sem/Feat:buvttadan#láhºki LAHKI ;
bádji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Event_Plc:bádºji BEARRI ;
dievasčoahkkinbargi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:dievas#čoahkkin#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
doaibmi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:doajbmi¤ ACTORGEAHCCI ;
duoldi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:duoldi¤ ACTOR ;
duođaláhki+N+Sem/Feat:duođa#láhºki LAHKI ;
oahppoláhki+N+Sem/Feat:oahppo#láhºki LAHKI ;
dáhppa+N+Sem/Dummytag:dáhppa DAHPPA ;
eallinláhki+N+Sem/Feat:eallin#láhºki LAHKI ;
ealáhusbargi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:ealáhus#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
ealáhusláhki+N+Sem/Feat:ealáhus#láhºki LAHKI ;
elihtačuoigi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:elihta#čuojgi¤ ACTOR ;
friijaealli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:friija#ealli¤ ACTOR ;
geahčči+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:geahčči¤ ACTORGEAHCCI ;
gielddabargi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:gieldda#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
goavdi+N+Sem/Dummytag:goavºdi BEARRI ;
guolleguovdi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:guolle#guovºdi BEARRI ;
guovddášguoddi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:guovddáš#guoddi¤ ACTOR "prosecutor N" ;
hálli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:hálli¤ ACTORGEAHCCI ;
iešbirgenláhki+N+Sem/Feat:ieš#birgen#láhºki LAHKI ;
iešláhki+N+Sem/Feat:ieš#láhºki LAHKI ;
industriijabargi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:industriija#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
juogaláhki+N+Err/Lex+Sem/Feat:juoga#láhºki LAHKI ;
jurddašanláhki+N+Sem/Feat:jurddašan#láhºki LAHKI ;
jurddahanláhki+N+Sem/Feat:jurddahan#láhºki LAHKI ;
jábmi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jábmi¤ ACTORGEAHCCI ;
liehkku+N+Sem/Dummytag:liehkku BEARRI ;
liehku+N+Sem/Dummytag:liehºku BEARRI ;
liigegirdi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Veh:liige#girdi¤ ACTOR ;
luondduláhki+N+Sem/Feat:luonddu#láhºki LAHKI ;
mearaluossabivdi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:meara#luossa#bivdi¤ ACTOR ;
miellaláhki+N+Sem/Feat:miella#láhºki LAHKI ;
muorračuohppi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:muorra#čuohppi¤ ACTOR ;
njuovvi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum_Pos:njuovvi¤ ACTOR ;
oahppi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oahppi¤ ACTORGEAHCCI ;
oapmi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:oapmi BEARRI ;
poastavuoddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:poasta#vuoddji¤ ACTOR ;
rádjanláhki+N+Sem/Feat:rádjan#láhºki LAHKI ;
rádjeovttasbargobuohtalasti+N+Sem/Dummytag:rádje#ovttas#bargo#buohtalasti¤ ACTOR ;
seaksaealliniešláhki+N+Sem/Feat:seaksa#eallin#ieš#láhºki LAHKI ;
seksaealliniešláhki+N+Sem/Feat:seksa#eallin#ieš#láhºki LAHKI ;
sosiálabargi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:sosi^ála#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
suolaoapmi+N+Sem/Dummytag:suola#oapmi BEARRI ;
tráktorvuoddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:tráktor#vuoddji¤ ACTOR ;
dáhpa+N+Sem/Dummytag:dáhpa DAHPPA ;
vuosti+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:vuosºti BEARRI ;
vuovdeskeaiki+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:vuovde#skeajki¤ ACTOR ;
váldi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum_Org:váldi¤ ACTORVALDI ;
árvu+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Feat:árºvu BEARRI ;
ássi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ássi¤ ACTORGEAHCCI ;
čoavdinláhki+N+Sem/Feat:čoavdin#láhºki LAHKI ;
